Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1158.
do enact as follows:SB1158,11Section 1. 11.0101 (20) of the statutes is created to read:SB1158,2,7211.0101 (20) “Mass communication” means a message that is disseminated by 3means of one or more communications media, a mass electronic communication, a 4mass distribution, or a mass telephoning, but not including a bona fide poll 5conducted for the purpose of objectively identifying or collecting data concerning the 6attitudes or preferences of electors, if all of the following apply to the 7communication:SB1158,3,21(a) The communication is made during the period beginning on the 60th day 2preceding an election and ending on the date of that election.SB1158,3,53(b) The communication includes a reference to a clearly identified candidate 4whose name is certified under s. 7.08 (2) (a) or 8.05 (1) (d) to appear on the ballot at 5that election.SB1158,3,76(c) The communication is susceptible of no reasonable interpretation other 7than as an appeal to vote for or against the candidate.SB1158,28Section 2. 11.0101 (20d) of the statutes is created to read:SB1158,3,10911.0101 (20d) “Mass distribution” means the distribution of 500 or more 10pieces of substantially identical material.SB1158,311Section 3. 11.0101 (20g) of the statutes is created to read:SB1158,3,141211.0101 (20g) “Mass electronic communication” means the transmission of 13500 or more pieces of substantially identical material by means of electronic mail or 14facsimile transmission.SB1158,415Section 4. 11.0101 (20r) of the statutes is created to read:SB1158,3,171611.0101 (20r) “Mass telephoning” means the making of 500 or more telephone 17calls conveying a substantially identical message.SB1158,518Section 5. 11.0204 (1) (a) 12. of the statutes is created to read:SB1158,3,221911.0204 (1) (a) 12. In the case of a candidate committee that has made a mass 20communication, a report containing all of the following information with respect to 21any obligation to make a disbursement incurred or any disbursement made for the 22purpose of making such a communication:SB1158,4,21a. The date on which the disbursement was made or the obligation was 2incurred.SB1158,4,33b. The amount of the disbursement or obligation.SB1158,4,54c. The name and address of the person to whom the disbursement was made 5or the obligation was incurred.SB1158,66Section 6. 11.0304 (1) (a) 12. of the statutes is created to read:SB1158,4,10711.0304 (1) (a) 12. In the case of a political party that has made a mass 8communication, a report containing all of the following information with respect to 9any obligation to make a disbursement incurred or any disbursement made for the 10purpose of making such a communication:SB1158,4,1211a. The date on which the disbursement was made or the obligation was 12incurred.SB1158,4,1313b. The amount of the disbursement or obligation.SB1158,4,1514c. The name and address of the person to whom the disbursement was made 15or the obligation was incurred.SB1158,716Section 7. 11.0404 (1) (a) 12. of the statutes is created to read:SB1158,4,201711.0404 (1) (a) 12. In the case of a legislative campaign committee that has 18made a mass communication, a report containing all of the following information 19with respect to any obligation to make a disbursement incurred or any 20disbursement made for the purpose of making such a communication:SB1158,4,2221a. The date on which the disbursement was made or the obligation was 22incurred.SB1158,4,2323b. The amount of the disbursement or obligation.SB1158,5,21c. The name and address of the person to whom the disbursement was made 2or the obligation was incurred.SB1158,83Section 8. 11.0502 (1) of the statutes is renumbered 11.0502 (1) (intro.) and 4amended to read:SB1158,5,7511.0502 (1) (intro.) Every A political action committee that to which any of the 6following applies shall file a registration statement giving the information required 7by s. 11.0503:SB1158,5,118(a) The political action committee makes or accepts contributions, makes 9disbursements, or incurs obligations to support or oppose a candidate in a calendar 10year in an aggregate amount in excess of $2,500 shall file a registration statement 11giving the information required by s. 11.0503.SB1158,912Section 9. 11.0502 (1) (b) of the statutes is created to read:SB1158,5,141311.0502 (1) (b) The political action committee makes a disbursement or incurs 14an obligation for the purpose of making a mass communication.SB1158,1015Section 10. 11.0502 (2) of the statutes is renumbered 11.0502 (2) (a) and 16amended to read:SB1158,5,221711.0502 (2) (a) A political action committee that triggers the registration 18requirement under sub. (1) (a) shall file the registration statement no later than the 1910th business day commencing after receipt of the first contribution by the political 20action committee exceeding the amount specified under sub. (1) (a), before making 21any disbursement exceeding that amount, and before incurring obligations 22exceeding that amount.SB1158,1123Section 11. 11.0502 (2) (b) of the statutes is created to read:SB1158,6,4111.0502 (2) (b) A political action committee that triggers the registration 2requirement under sub. (1) (b) shall file the registration statement no later than the 310th business day commencing after making a disbursement or incurring an 4obligation for the purpose of making a mass communication.SB1158,125Section 12. 11.0504 (1) (a) 12. of the statutes is created to read:SB1158,6,9611.0504 (1) (a) 12. In the case of a political action committee that has made a 7mass communication, a report containing all of the following information with 8respect to any obligation to make a disbursement incurred or any disbursement 9made for the purpose of making such a communication:SB1158,6,1110a. The date on which the disbursement was made or the obligation was 11incurred.SB1158,6,1212b. The amount of the disbursement or obligation.SB1158,6,1413c. The name and address of the person to whom the disbursement was made 14or the obligation was incurred.SB1158,1315Section 13. 11.0602 (1) of the statutes is renumbered 11.0602 (1) (intro.) and 16amended to read:SB1158,6,191711.0602 (1) (intro.) Every An independent expenditure committee that to 18which any of the following applies shall file a registration statement giving the 19information required by s. 11.0603:SB1158,6,2320(a) The independent expenditure committee makes or accepts contributions, 21makes disbursements, or incurs obligations to support or oppose a candidate in a 22calendar year in an aggregate amount in excess of $2,500 shall file a registration 23statement giving the information required by s. 11.0603. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb1158 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb1158 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB1158 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB1158 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB1158: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting